Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-910
Rules and regulations; authority of board.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall have the power and authority to prescribe such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary and proper, but which are not inconsistent with the Constitution and statutes of this state, relating to the leasing of school and public lands for oil and gas exploration and development.

Laws 1943, c. 164, § 10, p. 582;

R.S.1943, § 72-910.